Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1307
Diseased meat; sale; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sell or offer for sale the flesh of a diseased animal, whether such animal shall have died of disease or shall have been butchered when in a diseased condition. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 291.